Maryland, session 2025, SB1044.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
7–811.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “ALTERNATIVE SCHOOL VEHICLE” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN
COMAR 13A.06.07.01.
(3) “MULTIFUNCTION SCHOOL ACTIVITY BUS” HAS THE MEANING
STATED IN COMAR 13A.06.07.01.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb1044*

SENATE BILL 1044
(4) “TYPE I SCHOOL VEHICLE” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN §
11–173 OF THE TRANSPORTATION ARTICLE.
(5) “TYPE II SCHOOL VEHICLE” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN §
11–174 OF THE TRANSPORTATION ARTICLE.
(B) THE STATE BOARD SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS TO ALLOW THE USE OF
ALTERNATIVE SCHOOL VEHICLES TO TRANSPORT STUDENTS TO AND FROM SCHOOL:
(1) (I) IF A COUNTY BOARD DETERMINES THAT IT IS NECESSARY TO
OWN, OPERATE, OR CONTRACT THE USE OF AN ALTERNATIVE SCHOOL VEHICLE TO
TRANSPORT STUDENTS TO AND FROM SCHOOL; OR
(II) IF THE VEHICLE IS:
1. A TAXICAB;
2. A COMMERCIAL MOTOR COACH; OR
3. OPERATED BY A TRANSPORTATION NETWORK
OPERATOR PROVIDING TRANSPORTATION NETWORK SERVICES, AS DEFINED IN §
10–101 OF THE PUBLIC UTILITIES ARTICLE; AND
(2) REGARDLESS OF WHETHER THE VEHICLE:
(I) TRANSPORTS MORE THAN ONE STUDENT;
(II) HAS AN AUDIBLE BACK–UP WARNING ALARM INSTALLED
BEHIND THE REAR AXLE;
(III) HAS A FIRST AID KIT;
(IV) HAS A FLUID CLEANUP KIT;
(V) HAS A FIRE EXTINGUISHER; OR
(VI) HAS A SEAT BELT CUTTER THAT IS ACCESSIBLE TO THE
DRIVER.
(C) (1) THE REGULATIONS ADOPTED UNDER THIS SECTION SHALL
REQUIRE ALTERNATIVE SCHOOL VEHICLES ALLOWED UNDER SUBSECTION (B) OF
THIS SECTION AND MULTIFUNCTION SCHOOL ACTIVITY BUSES TO:

SENATE BILL 1044 3
(I) UNDERGO TWO INSPECTIONS EACH SCHOOL YEAR THAT
ARE MORE THAN 120 DAYS APART; AND
(II) BE INSPECTED BY TECHNICIANS CERTIFIED BY THE
NATIONAL INSTITUTE FOR AUTOMOTIVE SERVICE EXCELLENCE.
(2) RECORDS OF EACH INSPECTION REQUIRED UNDER PARAGRAPH
(1) OF THIS SUBSECTION SHALL BE MAINTAINED BY:
(I) THE CONTRACTED TRANSPORTATION PROVIDER; OR
(II) IF A LOCAL SCHOOL SYSTEM OWNS THE ALTERNATIVE
SCHOOL VEHICLE OR MULTIFUNCTION SCHOOL ACTIVITY BUS, THE
TRANSPORTATION OFFICE OF THE LOCAL SCHOOL SYSTEM.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.